Tennessee, session 114, SB2521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-3105(c), is amended by deleting
"No later than December 31, 2025 and by December 31 of 2026 and 2027 thereafter" and
substituting "No later than December 31, 2026, and by December 31 of 2027 thereafter".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-3105(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(9) Recommendations on strategies to detect and minimize the risk of fraud
committed by persons using artificial intelligence.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2521
012055
- 1 -